District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.03

Repealed

Tax on corporations — Financial institutions included.

Repealed.

Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 302(a)(2), 31 DCR 3974
1981 Ed., § 47-1807.3.
Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 19-53, in section 8074 of D.C. Law 19-21, substituted “for tax years beginning after December 31, 2010” for “as of December 31, 2010”.
Section 15(b) of D.C. Law 19-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.